Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.595

State interoperability executive committee—Composition—Responsibilities.

(1) The director shall appoint a state interoperability executive committee, the membership of which must include, but not be limited to, representatives of the military department, the Washington state patrol, the department of transportation, Washington technology solutions, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of health, the department of corrections, city and county governments, state and local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs, state and local emergency management directors, tribal nations, and public safety answering points, commonly known as 911 call centers. The chair and legislative members of the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting membership may not exceed twenty-two members.

(2) The director shall appoint the chair of the committee from among the voting members of the committee.

(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop policies and make recommendations for technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems, including emergency communications systems. The standards must address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking into account both existing and future systems and technologies;

(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the department the licensing and use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and serve as the point of contact with the federal communications commission and the first responders network authority on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of radio spectrum;

(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio communications system equipment to ensure that:

(i) Any new trunked radio system shall be, at a minimum, project-25; and

(ii) Any new land-mobile radio system that requires advanced digital features shall be, at a minimum, project-25;

(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for state-sponsored wireless communications systems;

(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;

(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and emergency response organizations;

(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response wireless communications systems; and

(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the director to promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

(4) The department shall provide administrative support to the committee.

[ 2024 c 54 s 20; 2017 c 92 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 213; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 717. Formerly RCW 43.105.331, 43.41A.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.